Louisiana, session 2026, SB419.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 56:116(C) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§116. Wild birds and wild quadrupeds; special hunting seasons
* * *
C.(1) The commission may establish a special deer season for primitive
firearms. The taking of deer in such season shall be limited to persons who are
licensed in accordance with the provisions of R.S. 56:3002. The commission shall
adopt and promulgate rules and regulations governing such season, including the
type and size of weapons used, licenses required, sex of deer to be hunted, and the
areas included in the season.
(2) In addition to any other weapon restriction the commission may adopt,
such rules and regulations shall provide that breech for the use of the following
during primitive firearm season:
(a) Breech loading rifles with a caliber of .35 or larger may be used during
primitive firearms season.
(b) Pre-charged pneumatic devices that fire a projectile with a caliber of
.30 or larger, a weight of one hundred fifty grains or larger, and a minimum
muzzle velocity of eight hundred feet per second, or with any combination of
bullet weight and muzzle velocity that produces muzzle energy of at least two
hundred fifteen foot pounds of energy.
(3) The taking of deer during this season primitive firearm season shall be
limited to still hunting and may be allowed in all or some areas of the state where
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 419 ENROLLED
deer hunting is now or shall in the future be allowed.
(2)(4) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, during
primitive firearms season any licensee may use a magnified scope on any weapon
authorized for use during the primitive firearms season.
* * *
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.